North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 7. Miscellaneous Provisions.
§ 136-102.6.
Compliance of subdivision streets with minimum standards of the Board of Transportation required of developers.

The owner of a tract or parcel of land which is subdivided from and after October 1, 1975, into two or more lots, building sites, or other divisions for sale or building development for residential purposes, where such subdivision includes a new street or the changing of an existing street, shall record a map or plat of the subdivision with the register of deeds of the county in which the land is located. The map or plat shall be recorded prior to any conveyance of a portion of said land, by reference to said map or plat.

The right-of-way of any new street or change in an existing street shall be delineated upon the map or plat with particularity and such streets shall be designated to be either public or private. Any street designated on the plat or map as public shall be conclusively presumed to be an offer of dedication to the public of such street.

The right-of-way and design of streets designated as public shall be in accordance with the minimum right-of-way and construction standards established by the Board of Transportation for acceptance on the State highway system. If a municipal or county subdivision control ordinance is in effect in the area proposed for subdivision, the map or plat required by this section shall not be recorded by the register of deeds until after it has received final plat approval by the municipality or county, and until after it has received a certificate of approval by the Division of Highways as herein provided as to those streets regulated in subsection (g). The certificate of approval may be issued by a district engineer of the Division of Highways of the Department of Transportation.

The right-of-way and construction plans for such public streets in residential subdivisions, including plans for street drainage, shall be submitted to the Division of Highways for review and approval, prior to the recording of the subdivision plat in the office of the register of deeds. The plat or map required by this section shall not be recorded by the register of deeds without a certification pursuant to

G.S. 47-30.2

and, if determined to be necessary by the Review Officer, a certificate of approval by the Division of Highways of the plans for the public street as being in accordance with the minimum standards of the Board of Transportation for acceptance of the subdivision street on the State highway system for maintenance. The Review Officer shall not certify a map or plat subject to this section unless the new streets or changes in existing streets are designated either public or private. The certificate of approval shall not be deemed an acceptance of the dedication of the streets on the subdivision plat or map. Final acceptance by the Division of Highways of the public streets and placing them on the State highway system for maintenance shall be conclusive proof that the streets have been constructed according to the minimum standards of the Board of Transportation. The Board of Transportation must approve the addition of subdivision street improvements designated as public to the State highway system for maintenance pursuant to this subsection within 90 days after the Department of Transportation receives a petition for road addition and the Department determines those subdivision streets meet the minimum standards of the Board of Transportation.

No person or firm shall place or erect any utility in, over, or upon the existing or proposed right-of-way of any street in a subdivision to which this section applies, except in accordance with the Division of Highway’s policies and procedures for accommodating utilities on highway rights-of-way, until the Division of Highways has given written approval of the location of such utilities. Written approval may be in the form of exchange of correspondence until such times as it is requested to add the street or streets to the State system, at which time an encroachment agreement furnished by the Division of Highways must be executed between the owner of the utility and the Division of Highways. The right of any utility placed or located on a proposed or existing subdivision public street right-of-way shall be subordinate to the street right-of-way, and the utility shall be subject to regulation by the Department of Transportation. Utilities are defined as electric power, telephone, television, telegraph, water, sewage, gas, oil, petroleum products, steam, chemicals, drainage, irrigation, and similar lines. Any utility installed in a subdivision street not in accordance with the Division of Highways accommodation policy, and without prior approval by the Division of Highways, shall be removed or relocated at no expense to the Division of Highways.

Prior to entering any agreement or any conveyance with any prospective buyer, the developer and seller shall prepare and sign, and the buyer of the subject real estate shall receive and sign an acknowledgment of receipt of a separate instrument known as the subdivision streets disclosure statement (hereinafter referred to as disclosure statement). Said disclosure statement shall fully and completely disclose the status (whether public or private) of the street upon which the house or lot fronts. If the street is designated by the developer and seller as a public street, the developer and seller shall certify that the right-of-way and design of the street has been approved by the Division of Highways, and that the street has been or will be constructed by the developer and seller in accordance with the standards for subdivision streets adopted by the Board of Transportation for acceptance on the highway system. If the street is designated by the developer and seller as a private street, the developer and seller shall include in the disclosure statement an explanation of the consequences and responsibility as to maintenance of a private street, and shall fully and accurately disclose the party or parties upon whom responsibility for construction and maintenance of such street or streets shall rest, and shall further disclose that the street or streets will not be constructed to minimum standards, sufficient to allow their inclusion on the State highway system for maintenance. The disclosure statement shall contain a duplicate original which shall be given to the buyer. Written acknowledgment of receipt of the disclosure statement by the buyer shall be conclusive proof of the delivery thereof.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all subdivisions located outside municipal corporate limits. As to subdivisions inside municipalities, this section shall apply to all proposed streets or changes in existing streets on the State highway system as shown on the comprehensive plan for the future development of the street system made pursuant to

G.S. 136-66.2

, and in effect at the date of approval of the map or plat.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any subdivision that consists only of lots located on Lakes Hickory, Norman, Mountain Island and Wylie which are lakes formed by the Catawba River which lots are leased upon October 1, 1975. No roads in any such subdivision shall be added to the State maintained road system without first having been brought up to standards established by the Board of Transportation for inclusion of roads in the system, without expense to the State. Prior to entering any agreement or any conveyance with any prospective buyer of a lot in any such subdivision, the seller shall prepare and sign, and the buyer shall receive and sign an acknowledgment of receipt of a statement fully and completely disclosing the status of and the responsibility for construction and maintenance of the road upon which such lot is located.

The purpose of this section is to insure that new subdivision streets described herein to be dedicated to the public will comply with the State standards for placing subdivision streets on the State highway system for maintenance, or that full and accurate disclosure of the responsibility for construction and maintenance of private streets be made. This section shall be construed and applied in a manner which shall not inhibit the ability of public utilities to satisfy service requirements of subdivisions to which this section applies.

The Division of Highways and district engineers of the Division of Highways of the Department of Transportation shall issue a certificate of approval for any subdivision affected by a transportation corridor official map established by the Board of Transportation only if the subdivision conforms to Article 2E of this Chapter or conforms to any variance issued in accordance with that Article.

A willful violation of any of the provisions of this section shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1975, c. 488, s. 1; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 8; 1987, c. 747, s. 21; 1993, c. 539, s. 996; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-309, s. 4; 1998-184, s. 3; 2021-121, s. 9(a).

§ 136-102.7.
Hurricane evacuation standard.

Evacuation Standard. —

The hurricane evacuation standard to be used for any bridge or highway construction project pursuant to this Chapter shall be no more than 18 hours, as recommended by the State Emergency Management officials.

History.

2005-275, s. 5.

§ 136-102.8.
Subdivision streets; traffic calming devices.

The Department shall establish policies and procedures for the installation or utilization of traffic tables or traffic calming devices erected on State-maintained subdivision streets adopted by the Department, pursuant to

G.S. 136-102.6

, if all of the following requirements are met:

A traffic engineering study has been approved by the Department detailing types and locations of traffic calming devices.

Installation and utilization of traffic tables or traffic calming devices is within one of the following areas:

A subdivision with a homeowners association.

A neighborhood in which the property owners have established a contractual agreement outlining responsibility for traffic calming devices installed in the neighborhood.

The traffic tables or traffic calming devices are paid for and maintained by the subdivision homeowners association, or its successor, or pursuant to a neighborhood agreement.

The homeowners association has the written support, for the installation of each traffic table or traffic calming device approved by the Department pursuant to this section, of at least sixty percent (60%) of the member property owners, or the neighborhood agreement is signed by at least sixty percent (60%) of the neighborhood property owners.

The homeowners association, or neighborhood pursuant to its agreement, posts a performance bond with the Department sufficient to fund maintenance or removal of the traffic tables or calming devices, if the homeowners association, or neighborhood pursuant to its agreement, fails to maintain them, or is dissolved. The bond shall remain in place for a period of three years from the date of installation.

History.

2009-310, s. 1; 2015-217, s. 2.

§ 136-102.9.
Use of aircraft managed by the Department of Transportation.

Of the aircraft managed by the Department of Transportation, the use of aircraft for economic development purposes shall take precedence over all other uses except in cases of emergency or disaster response. The Department of Transportation shall annually review the rates charged for the use of aircraft and shall adjust the rates, as necessary, to account for upgraded aircraft and inflationary increases in operating costs, including jet fuel prices. If an aircraft is used to attend athletic events or for any other purpose related to collegiate athletics, the rate charged shall be equal to the direct cost of operating the aircraft as established by the aircraft’s manufacturer, adjusted for inflation.

History.

2010-31, s. 14.6(c).

§ 136-102.10.
Rest areas report.

No later than October 1 of each year, the Department shall submit an annual report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division that contains the following information:

Total inventory of rest areas.

Location and description of each rest area to include condition of the rest area buildings, parking, landscape, ingress and egress roads, restrooms, lighting, vending, whether collocated with a welcome center, and availability of Wi-Fi and cell phone service strength.

Most recent reopening date and the reason and length of closure before reopening.

Actual expenditures by categories to include staff, contracts, building operations, and other maintenance.

Number of estimated visitors and how estimated visitors are calculated.

Planned renovations and closures for renovations.

History.

2021-180, s. 41.23(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.8, made this section, as added by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 41.23(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 41.23(b), provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 136-102.10

, as enacted by this act, the initial annual report on rest areas is due no later than March 30, 2022.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§§ 136-102.11 through 136-102.49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.